New Jersey, session 221, S3651.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.19:15-17 is amended to read as follows: 19:15-17.    a.  (1) The comparison of signatures of a voter made upon registration and upon election day, and if the voter alleges his inability to write, the comparison of the answers made by such voter upon registration and upon election day, shall [be had] occur in full view of the challengers. (2)   The examination of any document concerning proof of identification of a voter, set forth in subsection b. of this section, made upon election day shall occur in full view of the challengers. b.    (1)  If a voter has registered by mail after January 1, 2003 to vote for the first time in his or her current county of residence and did not provide personal identification when registering pursuant to section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4), the voter shall be permitted to vote starting at the first election held after January 1, 2004 at which candidates are seeking federal office after displaying one of the following items: [(1)] a current and valid photo identification card; [(2)] a current utility bill, bank statement, government check or pay check; [(3)] any other government document that shows the voter's name and current address; or [(4)] any other identifying document that the [Attorney General] Secretary of State has determined to be acceptable for this purpose. (2)   In addition to the display of documentation as may be required by paragraph (1) of this subsection, beginning with the first election held after January 1, 2025, regardless of when the voter registered and the method of registration, the voter shall be permitted to vote, unless otherwise exempt pursuant to this subsection, only by displaying a document as valid proof of identification, which may be a New Jersey drivers license, New Jersey nondrivers identification card, or other document, that includes all of the following criteria: (a)   the name of the voter to whom the document was issued, and which conforms to the name under which the voter is registered and from whom the signature is produced for making comparisons of signatures; (b)   a photograph of the voter to whom the document was issued; (c)   an expiration date that has either not expired, or expired only after the date of the most recent election; and (d)   was issued by the federal government or this State. A voter shall be required to display only one document with respect to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, if that document satisfies the identifying document criteria set forth in both paragraphs. (3)   If the voter does not display [one of these documents,] a document in accordance with paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection, or the validity of a document is subject to challenge after examination, the voter shall not be permitted to vote by machine but shall instead be provided with a provisional ballot, pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1999, c.232 (C.19:53C-1 et seq.); except that, a voter who does not display a document in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection due to a religious objection to being photographed shall be permitted to vote by machine if the voter establishes an exemption due to a religious objection by executing a sworn affidavit as to the religious objection. This subsection shall not apply to any voter entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act" (42 U.S.C. 1973ff-1 et seq) or to any voter who is provided the right to vote other than in person under section 3 of Pub.L.98-435 (42 U.S.C. s.1973ee-1), the "Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act," or any other voter entitled to vote otherwise than in person under any other federal law.  [This subsection shall also not apply to any person who registers to vote by appearing in person at any voter registration agency or to any person whose voter registration form is delivered to the county commissioner of registration or to the Attorney General, as the case may be, through a third party by means other than by mail delivery.] c.     Each county commissioner of registration shall collect and maintain, in the manner prescribed by the [Attorney General] Secretary of State, the information provided pursuant to subsection b. of this section and section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4).  Access to the personal identification information provided pursuant to subsection b. of this section and section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4) [.] shall be prohibited, in accordance with subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5). (cf: P.L.2004, c.88, s.9) 2.    R.S.19:7-5 is amended to read as follows: 19:7-5.  Such challengers shall be the authorized challengers for their respective political parties and candidates or for the proponents or opponents of a public question. They shall have the power to challenge the right to vote therein of any person claiming such right and shall have power to examine any document presented concerning proof of identification of that person and to ask all necessary questions to determine this right. They may be present while the votes cast at any election are being counted, hear and see the ballots counted and shall have the right and power to challenge the counting or rejecting of any ballot or any part of a ballot. They shall be entitled to ask the members of the district boards of election at each polling place, no more than every two hours, for the official count of how many voters have voted at each precinct, and the district boards of election shall provide this information as the notice required pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2018, c.110 (C.19:52-3.1). (cf: P.L.2018, c.110, s.2) 3.    R.S.19:15-18 is amended to read as follows: 19:15-18.  The members of the district boards and any duly authorized challenger, respectively, shall at any election challenge every person who shall claim to have a right to vote therein whom they or he shall know, suspect or believe not to be qualified or entitled to so vote, and said members of the district board or challenger shall have the power and right to examine any document concerning proof of identification of that person and to ask all questions which are suitable and necessary to determine such person's right. No member of the district board and no duly authorized challenger shall, however, challenge, delay or prevent the right to vote of any person because of that person's race, color, national origin, expected manner of casting a vote or residence in a particular ward, housing complex or section of a municipality or county, provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit a challenge based upon the failure of the challenged voter to meet the applicable statutory residency qualification for voting in the particular election district.  Any member of the district board or duly authorized challenger who violates this section is guilty of a disorderly persons offense. (cf: P.L.1991, c.249, s.1) 4.    Section 2 of P.L.1991, c.249 (C.19:15-18.1) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  Any voter whose name does not appear on a challenge list prepared by the superintendent of elections of the county but who is challenged as not qualified or entitled to vote by a duly authorized challenger or by a member of a district board of elections shall be permitted to establish his right to vote by: (1)   signing an affidavit which states the voter's qualifications to vote on forms to be supplied by the superintendent of elections in those counties having a superintendent of elections or by the commissioner of registration in all other counties, and; (2)   presenting for inspection [a suitable] a provisional identifying document, [which] if having displayed a document as valid proof of identification in accordance with subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17 or having executed an affidavit as to a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption to the identification requirement, but the validity of this previously displayed document or executed affidavit is the subject of the challenge.  The provisional document may be, but is not limited to, the following: (a)   [a valid New Jersey driver's license;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (b)   a sample ballot which lists the voter's name and address; (c)   an official federal, State, county or municipal document which lists the voter's name and address; (d)   a utility or telephone bill or tax or rent receipt dated; or (e)   a piece of mail postmarked, on or after the 60th day before the day of the election at which the voter is challenged. b.    A copy of the affidavit signed by the challenged voter shall be given to that person. c.     The affidavit, or a form attached to it, shall state: (1)   the means by which a person whose name does not appear on a challenge list prepared by the superintendent of elections of the county but who is challenged by a duly authorized challenger or by a member of the district board of elections may seek to establish the person's right to vote, as provided in subsection a. of this section; (2)   that a challenger who succeeds in denying a voter the right to vote must sign an affidavit stating the reason why the voter is not entitled to vote and must furnish a copy of the affidavit to the challenged voter, as provided in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.249 (C.19:15-18.2); (3)   the legal remedy which a person whose name does not appear on a challenge list prepared by the superintendent of elections of the county but who is challenged by a duly authorized challenger or by a member of the district board of elections and denied the right to vote may use to seek permission to vote, as provided in section 6 of P.L.1991, c.249 (C.19:15-18.3). d.    In counties in which the primary language of 10% or more of the registered voters is Spanish, the affidavit and instructions for its completion and the information required by subsection c. of this section shall appear in both English and Spanish. (cf: P.L.1991, c.249, s.2) 5.    Section 3 of P.L.1991, c.249 (C.19:15-18.2) is amended to read as follows: 3.    If a person whose name does not appear on a challenge list prepared by the superintendent of elections of the county is challenged as not qualified or entitled to vote by a duly authorized challenger or by a member of the district board of elections and if this challenge is sustained by the district board of elections, the person making the challenge shall specify the grounds for the challenge in a signed affidavit on forms to be supplied by the superintendent of elections in those counties having a superintendent of elections or by the county clerk in all other counties.  This document also shall state that the challenged voter has sought to establish his right to vote by signing an affidavit which states the challenged voter's qualifications to vote and by presenting [a suitable] provisional identifying document in accordance with paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 2 of P.L.1991, c.249 (C.19:15-18.1), the [identity] description of which shall be specified [by the challenger] in the document, in those cases in which the challenged voter is being challenged based upon the validity of a document displayed as proof of identification in accordance with subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17 or the validity of an executed affidavit of religious objection to being photographed as an exemption in accordance with paragraph (3) of that subsection.  A copy of the challenger's affidavit shall be given to the challenged voter. (cf: P.L.1991, c.249, s.3) 6.    Section 6 of P.L.1991, c.249 (C.19:15-18.3) is amended to read as follows: 6.    Any person whose name does not appear on a challenge list prepared by the superintendent of elections of the county but who is challenged and denied the right to vote on the day of a municipal, primary, general, or special election by a duly authorized challenger or by a member of a district board of elections, may apply to a Superior Court judge sitting at the county seat for permission to vote.  No papers need be filed; the court shall entertain oral applications.  The challenged voter may appear pro se or with counsel.  The challenger or the member of the district board, as the case may be, may appear or be represented by counsel.  The challenged voter shall be permitted to state by oath or affirmation the facts which the voter believes establish eligibility to vote, shall furnish a copy of the affidavit the voter signed when challenged, a copy of the affidavit signed by the challenger and, if being challenged based on the display of a document as valid proof of identification in accordance with subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17 or based upon the validity of an executed affidavit for an exemption due to a religious objection to being photographed with respect to paragraph (3) of that subsection, the identifying document found invalid by the challenger and the district board.  The rules of evidence shall not apply to those proceedings.  The judge shall grant the application and provide the challenged voter with written authorization to vote on that day if the judge finds the following facts to be established by the testimony of the applicant or, in the case of a dispute of facts or some questions as to the challenged voter's credibility, by a preponderance of the following evidence: a.     The challenged voter is at least 18 years old and a citizen of the United States and of this State, has resided in the county at least 30 days prior to the date of the election, and has not been convicted of a crime which would disenfranchise a person under the laws of this State, and [either]: b.    The challenged voter is properly registered at his location; [or] c.     The challenged voter was properly registered at his location as of the last election at which the challenged voter voted but has moved to another location within the county since then and in good faith attempted to register at the new address within the time prescribed by law; or d.    The challenged voter has produced a document as valid proof of identification or a valid executed affidavit of religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from the identification requirement of subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17 in accordance with paragraph (3) of that subsection. For the purposes of this section, a good faith attempt to register shall include: completing the prescribed registration form no later than 21 days before the election in the presence of a person who appears to be over 18 years old and says that he or she can and will witness the form and mail it to the register for the applicant; completing a form received in the mail from the commissioner of registration, superintendent of elections or the county board which states that information has been received that the applicant has moved and placing the completed form in a proper mailbox with proper postage, if necessary, no later than 21 days before the election; completing a registration form in any government office; and reasonably relying upon the oral statements of an official at a polling place that they will insure proper reregistration. The judge of the Superior Court having the application shall cause a full record of the proceeding to be taken stenographically, transcribed and filed in the office of the county clerk of the county, which record shall be open and public record.  All costs and expenses of such proceedings shall be paid by the county. (cf: P.L.2005, c.139, s.5) 7.    R.S.19:15-22 is amended to read as follows: 19:15-22.    Upon any question or challenge of a voter duly registered it shall be the duty of the board, and the privilege of all its members, to examine any document presented concerning proof of identification and to put all such questions as are proper to determine the right of the voter to vote. (cf: R.S.19:15-22) 8.    R.S.19:15-23 is amended to read as follows: 19:15-23.    In municipalities having permanent registration, if a voter is challenged, the board, in addition to examining any document presented concerning proof of identification of the voter, shall ask him the questions which were asked him upon registration, the answers to which appear on the signature copy register and if the answers do not correspond a note of such fact shall be entered in the column of the poll book entitled "remarks".  If the document of the voter appears invalid, or the signatures of the voter or the answers to the questions made by the voter do not correspond, then it shall be the privilege of the challengers to challenge, and the duty of each member of the district board to challenge, unless some other authorized person shall challenge. (cf: R.S.19:15-23) 9.    R.S.19:15-24 is amended to read as follows: 19:15-24.  The district boards shall not give a ballot to any person unless they shall be satisfied that such person is in all respects qualified and entitled to vote; and for the purpose of satisfying themselves as to the right of any person who shall claim a right to vote they shall have power to examine such person, and any other person or persons, under oath or affirmation, touching such right, except as hereinbefore restricted.  The board shall determine the right of the voter to vote, after making use of, and giving due weight to, the evidence afforded by his document presented concerning proof of identification in accordance with subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, and his signature, if any, such answers after examination as provided herein, [and an] any affidavit which states the challenged voter's qualifications to vote and [a suitable] any identifying document, as provided under section 2 of P.L.1991, c.249 (C.19:15-18.1).  If any member of the board shall give or assent to give a ballot to any person challenged, without requiring him to take the oath or affirmation hereinbefore prescribed to be made upon such challenge, and the person shall not be qualified and entitled to vote, the member so giving or assenting to give a ballot, shall be deemed to have given to such person a ballot, knowing it to be illegal.  The question as to the giving of the ballot to the person shall be put in the following form: "Shall a ballot be given to this person by this board?" If a majority of the board shall decide to give a ballot to such voter or in case of a tie vote, the voter shall be given a ballot and allowed to vote. If a majority of the board shall decide against giving a ballot to the voter no ballot shall be given, but in the case of a voter who is denied a ballot because the board finds that the voter did not display a document as valid proof of identification in accordance with subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, or did not provide a valid executed affidavit of religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from this requirement in accordance with paragraph (3) of that subsection, that voter shall be provided with a provisional ballot pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1999, c.232 (C.19:53C-1 et al.). [The] Except with respect to a person who is herein provided a provisional ballot for failing to display a document as valid proof of identification or to provide an executed affidavit of religious objection to being photographed as an exemption to the identification requirement, the board upon demand of a member of the board or any other citizen shall forthwith issue a warrant for the arrest of [such] a person denied a ballot and deliver the same to a peace officer, who shall forthwith arrest him[, and the]. The right to challenge voters shall exist until the ballot shall have been deposited in the ballot box.  Every such challenge and the determination of the board shall in every instance be recorded in the signature comparison record, in the column "Sig. Comp. by," used at the election at which the challenge has been made. Any member of a district board who refuses or neglects to comply with the provisions of this section may be summarily removed from office by the county board, or any judge of the Superior Court assigned to the county. (cf: P.L.1991, c.249, s.5) 10.  Section 2 of P.L.1994, c.170 (C.19:31-3.3) is amended to read as follows: 2.    The commissioner may eliminate the use of the duplicate permanent registration binders and may authorize and direct the use at the polls in place of such a binder, as a signature copy register for the purposes of this Title and Title 40 of the Revised Statutes, of a polling record which identifies on each page the election at which the record is used, which indicates for each registrant the name, address, and date of birth of the registrant and identifies the municipality and the particular election district therein from which the person is registered, and which includes adjacent to the registrant's name and address an imprint of the digitalized image of the registrant's signature and sufficient space, immediately to the left or right of that imprint, for the registrant to sign the record, which imprint and signature shall be used as the signature comparison record as prescribed by this Title.  The polling record shall also include for each registrant the registrant's date of birth, an indication of whether the registrant has applied for a mail-in ballot in that election, and a place to indicate [whether] that the registrant has provided the identification pursuant to R.S.19:15-17 [, if such identification is required]. The polling record shall also include for each registrant sufficient space for the notation of remarks as provided by R.S.19:15-23 and for the recording of any challenge and the determination thereof by the district board as provided by R.S.19:15-24, or by other elections officials charged with the same duties as the district board in connection with the conduct of an election.  In the case of a primary election, the polling record shall also indicate for each registrant the political party, if any, of which the registrant is a member for the purpose of voting at that primary election. Polling records for each election shall be prepared by the commissioner of registration not later than the 10th day preceding the election.  At each election, the delivery of the polling records to the municipal clerk and to the district boards or other elections officials charged with the same duties as the district board in connection with the conduct of an election, and the return of those records by the district boards or such other elections officials to the commissioner of registration, shall be made in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner of registration shall retain the polling records for any election for a period of not less than six years following that election. (cf: P.L.2009, c.79, s.31) 11.  R.S.19:31-5 is amended to read as follows: 19:31-5.  Each person, who is at least 17 years of age at the time he or she applies for registration, who resides in the district in which he or she expects to vote, who will be of the age of 18 years or more on or before the first election in which he or she expects to vote, who is a citizen of the United States, and who, if he or she continues to reside in the district until that election, will at the time have fulfilled all the requirements as to length of residence to qualify him or her as a legal voter, shall, unless otherwise disqualified, be entitled to be registered in such district. Each 17-year-old registrant shall be designated in the Statewide voter registration system as temporarily ineligible to vote until the registrant's 18th birthday, except as provided pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2023, c.202 (C.19:4-1.2). Whenever an individual registers by mail after January 1, 2003 to vote for the first time in his or her current county of residence, that individual shall provide either the individual's New Jersey driver's license number or the last four digits of the individual's Social Security Number, or shall submit with the voter registration form a copy of: (1) a current and valid photo identification card; (2) a current utility bill, bank statement, government check or pay check; (3) any other government document that shows the individual's name and current address; or (4) any other identifying document that the [Attorney General] Secretary of State has determined to be acceptable for this purpose.  If the individual does not provide his or her New Jersey driver's license number or Social Security Number information or submit a copy of any one of these documents, either at the time of registration or at any time thereafter prior to attempting to vote, the individual, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, shall be asked for identification when voting for the first time starting at the first election held after January 1, 2004 at which candidates are seeking federal office or thereafter. Starting with the first election held after January 1, 2025 and thereafter, regardless of when an individual registered, the method of voter registration, and any identifying information provided with the voter registration form, the individual shall be permitted to vote only after displaying a document as valid proof of identification in accordance with paragraph (2) of subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, or by executing an affidavit as to a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from this requirement in accordance with paragraph (3) of that subsection. [This requirement] The requirements herein concerning documented voter identification shall not apply to any individual entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act" (42 U.S.C. 1973ff-1 et seq.) or to any individual who is provided the right to vote other than in person under section 3 of Pub.L.98-435 (42 U.S.C. s.1973ee-1), the "Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act," or any other voter entitled to vote otherwise than in person under any other federal law.  [This requirement shall also not apply to any individual who registers to vote by appearing in person at any voter registration agency or to any individual whose voter registration form is delivered to the county commissioner of registration or to the Attorney General, as the case may be, through a third party by means other than by mail delivery.] Once registered, the registrant shall not be required to register again in such district as long as he or she resides therein, except when required to do so by the commissioner, because of the loss of or some defect in his or her registration record. The registrant, when registered as provided in this Title, shall be eligible to vote at any election to be held subsequent to such registration, if he or she shall be a citizen of the United States of the age of 18 years, except as provided pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2023, c.202 (C.19:4-1.2), and shall have been a resident of the State for at least 30 days and of the county at least 30 days, when the same is held, subject to any change in his qualifications which may later disqualify him.  No registrant shall lose the right to vote, and no registrant's name shall be removed from the registry list of the county in which the person is registered, solely on grounds of the person's failure to vote in one or more elections. (cf: P.L.2023, c.22, s.2) 12.  Section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4) is amended to read as follows: 16.  a.  The Secretary of State shall cause to be prepared and shall provide to each county commissioner of registration forms of size and weight suitable for mailing, which shall require the information required by R.S.19:31-3 in substantially the following form: VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION Print clearly in ink. Use ballpoint pen or marker. (1)   This form is being used as: [ ]    New registration [ ]    Address change [ ]    Name change (2)   Name:..................................................... ...............Last       First         Middle (3)   Are you a citizen of the United States of America? []Yes []No (4)   Will you be 18 years of age on or before election day? []Yes [] No If you checked 'No' in response to either of these questions, do not    complete this form. (5)   Street Address where you live: ......................................................... Street Address          Apt. No. ......................................................... (6)   City or Town County Zip Code (7)   Address Where You Receive Your Mail (if different from above): ............................................................ (8)   Date of Birth: ...................................................... Month     Day      Year (9)  (a)  Telephone Number (optional)...................... (b) E-Mail Address (optional)..................... (10)  Name and address of Your Last Voter Registration ............................................................ ............................................................ ............................................................ (11)  If you are registering by mail to vote and will be voting for the first time in your current county of residence, please provide one of the following: (a)   your New Jersey driver's license number:................................ (b)   the last four digits of your Social Security Number.................... OR submit with this form a copy of any one of the following documents: a current and valid photo identification card; a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, pay check or any other government or other identifying document that shows your name and current address. If you do not provide either your New Jersey driver's license number or the last four digits of your Social Security Number, or enclose a copy of one of the documents listed above, you will be asked for identification when voting for the first time, unless you are exempt from doing so under federal or State law. (12)  Do you wish to declare a political party affiliation? (Optional): [] YES. Name of Party: [] NO. I do not wish to declare a political party affiliation at this time. (13)  [] I wish to receive a Mail-in Ballot for all future elections, until I request otherwise in writing. (14)  Declaration - I swear or affirm that: I am a U.S. citizen. I live at the above address. I will be at least 18 years old on or before the day of the next election. I am not serving a sentence of incarceration due to a conviction for an indictable offense under any federal or State laws. I UNDERSTAND THAT ANY FALSE OR FRAUDULENT REGISTRATION MAY SUBJECT ME TO A FINE OF UP TO $15,000, IMPRISONMENT UP TO FIVE YEARS, OR BOTH PURSUANT TO R.S.19:34-1. ........................................................... Signature or mark of the registrant      Date (15)  If applicant is unable to complete this form, print the name and address of individual who completed this form. ................................................... Name ................................................... Address In addition, the form may include notice to the applicant of information and options relating to the registration and voting process, including but not limited to notice of qualifications required of a registered voter; notice of the final day by which a person must be registered to be eligible to vote in an election; notice of the effect of a failure to provide required identification information; a place at which the applicant may indicate availability for service as a member of the district board of elections; a place at which the applicant may indicate whether he or she requires a polling place which is accessible to individuals with disabilities and the elderly or whether he or she is legally blind; a place at which the applicant may indicate a desire to receive additional information concerning voting by mail; and if the application indicates a political party affiliation, the voter is permitted to vote in the primary election of a political party other than the political party in which the voter was affiliated previously only if the voter registration form with the change of political party affiliation is filed prior to the 50th day next preceding the primary election. The form may also include a space for the voter registration agency to record whether the applicant registered in person, by mail or by other means. b.    The reverse side of the registration form shall bear the address of the Secretary of State or the commissioner of registration to whom such form is supplied, and a United States postal permit the charges upon which shall be paid by the State. c.     The Secretary of State shall cause to be prepared registration forms of the size, weight and form described in subsection a. of this section in both the English and Spanish language and shall provide such forms to each commissioner of registration of any county in which there is at least one election district in which bilingual sample ballots must be provided pursuant to R.S.19:14-21, R.S.19:49-4 or section 2 of P.L.1965, c.29 (C.19:23-22.4). d.    The commissioner of registration shall furnish such registration forms upon request in person to any person or organization in such reasonable quantities as such person or organization shall request. The commissioner shall furnish no fewer than two such forms to any person upon request by mail or by telephone. e.     Each such registration form shall have annexed thereto instructions specifying the manner and method of registration, and the vote by mail option specified on the form, and stating the qualifications for an eligible voter. f.     The Secretary of State shall also furnish such registration forms and such instructions to the Director of the Division of Workers' Compensation, the Director of the Division of Employment Services, and the Director of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development; to the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury; to the Executive Director of the New Jersey Transit Corporation; to the appropriate administrative officer of any other public agency, as defined by subsection a. of section 15 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.3); to the Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs; and to the chief administrative officer of any voter registration agency, as defined in subsection a. of section 26 of P.L.1994, c.182 (C.19:31-6.11). g.    All registration forms received by the Secretary of State in the mail or forwarded to the Secretary of State shall be forwarded to the commissioner of registration in the county of the registrant. Each such form, and any registration form received otherwise by a commissioner of registration, shall be forwarded to the county clerk if the vote by mail option is selected on a form. h.    An application to register to vote received from the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission or a voter registration agency, as defined in subsection a. of section 26 of P.L.1994, c.182 (C.19:31-6.11), shall be deemed to have been timely made for the purpose of qualifying an eligible applicant as registered to vote in an election if the date on which the commission or agency shall have received that document in completed form, as indicated in the lower right hand corner of the form, was not later than the 21st day preceding that election. i.     Each commissioner of registration shall [make] note in the permanent registration file of each voter [who is required to provide] the personal identification information required pursuant to this section, as amended, and R.S.19:15-17, R.S.19:31-5 and Pub.L.107-252 (42 U.S.C.s. 15301 et seq.), [to] and indicate the type of identification provided by the voter and the date on which it is provided. Prior to the June 2004 primary election, when such a newly registered voter seeks to vote for the first time following his or her registration, the voter will be required to provide such personal identification information. Beginning with the June 2004 primary election, when such a newly registered voter seeks to vote for the first time following his or her registration, the voter will not be required to provide such information if he or she had previously provided the personal identification information required pursuant to this section. Beginning with the first election held after January 1, 2025, regardless of whether the newly registered voter is required to provide personal identification information the first time the voter seeks to vote following his or her registration, and each time voting thereafter, the voter shall provide personal identification information through valid documentation in accordance with paragraph (2) of subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, or provide an executed affidavit as to a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from this requirement in accordance with paragraph (3) of that subsection.  The required information shall be collected and stored for the time and in the manner required pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State. j.     The Secretary of State shall amend the voter registration application form if necessary to conform to the requirements of applicable federal or State law. k.    In the event that the name of any political party entered on the voter registration form by a voter who wishes to declare a political party affiliation is not legible, the commissioner of registration shall mail the voter a political party declaration form and a letter explaining that the voter's choice was not understood and that the voter should complete and return the declaration form in order to be affiliated with a party. (cf: P.L.2019, c.270, s.3) 13.  R.S.19:31-11 is amended to read as follows: 19:31-11.  a.  In all counties within the State, change of residence notices shall be made: (1) by a written request, signed by the registrant, forwarded to the commissioner by mail, and actually received by the commissioner; (2) by calling in person at the office of the commissioner or the municipal clerk; or (3) by completing and submitting a change of residence notice online as provided by the Secretary of State.  The commissioner shall provide change of residence notices in card form for the use of any registered voter moving to another address within the same election district; to another election district within the same county; or to another election district in another county for processing as provided under subsection c. of this section.  Copies of these notices shall also be available at the office of the municipal clerk in each municipality.  Each municipal clerk shall transmit daily to the commissioner all the filled out change of residence notices that may be in the municipal clerk's office at the time.  These notices shall be printed upon cards, shall contain a blank form showing where the applicant last resided and the address and exact location to which the applicant has moved and shall have a line for the applicant's signature, printed name and date of birth.  Upon receipt of such change of residence notice the commissioner shall cause the signature to be compared with the registration forms of the applicant and, if such signature appears to be of and by one and the same legal voter, the commissioner shall cause the entry of the change of residence to be made on those registration forms and the registrant shall thereupon be qualified to vote in the election district to which the registrant shall have so moved.  If the commissioner is not satisfied as to the signature on the request for a change of residence, a confirmation notice as prescribed by subsection d. of R.S.19:31-15 shall be sent by mail with postage prepaid to the registrant at the new address. The application for change of residence shall be filed with the commissioner or municipal clerk, as the case may be, on or before the 21st day preceding any election. b.    In any county any voter who, prior to an election, shall move within the same county after the time above prescribed for filing an application for change of residence without having made application for change of residence, or who has not returned a confirmation notice sent to the voter by the commissioner of registration of the county, if such a notice has been sent to the voter, or who has not moved since the previous election but whose registration information is missing or otherwise deficient, or has otherwise failed to notify the commissioner of registration of the voter's change of address within the county, shall be permitted to vote in that election in the district to which the voter has moved, upon making a written affirmation regarding the change of address at the polling place of the district in which the voter resides on the day of the election.  [No identifying] Beginning with the first election held after January 1, 2025, the voter shall present a document [shall be required from the voter], as described in paragraph (2) of subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, as valid proof of voter identification, or as described in paragraph (3) of that subsection as an executed affidavit as to a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from this identification requirement, for this affirmation.  A district board member shall provide the voter with a provisional ballot, and an envelope with an affirmation statement that conforms with the requirements for such documents contained in subsection b. of section 7 of P.L.1999, c.232 (C.19:53C-1).  The voter shall complete the provisional ballot and affirmation statement, place the ballot in the envelope, seal and return it to the district board member.  The board member shall review the information in the affirmation statement for completeness before forwarding it for inspection, tabulation and notation by the county board of elections, as provided for by sections 7 through 26 of P.L.1999, c.232 (C.19:53C-1 through C.19:53C-20).  The affirmation statement shall constitute a transfer to the registrant's new residence for any subsequent election.  However, if the voter has moved from one residence to another within the same election district at any time, the voter shall be permitted to vote in such election district at any election in the same manner as other voters at the polling place upon written affirmation by the registrant to the district board member of the registrant's change of address. c.     A voter who moves from an election district in one county to an election district in another county prior to the close of registration preceding an election shall register in the new county of residence, in accordance with the provisions of R.S.19:31-6, or shall file a change of residence notice with the commissioner of either county or complete and submit that notice online as provided by the Secretary of State, in order to be permitted to vote.  A change of residence notice filed by a voter pursuant to this subsection shall cause the commissioners of the county of previous residence and the county of new residence to update the voter registration record of that voter.  The commissioner of the county of new residence shall notify the voter by mail that the voter is now registered to vote in that county or, if the notice submitted by the voter is incomplete, to request any additional information or documentation necessary to finalize the change of residence notice.  Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to waive the requirement specified under R.S.19:31-5 that the voter shall have been a resident of the county of new residence for at least 30 days prior to being eligible to vote in any election in that county. (cf: P.L.2022, c.67, s.12) 14.  R.S.19:31-26 is amended to read as follows: 19:31-26.  The commissioner may make and maintain a card index file showing on separate cards the full name, address, birth date, driver's license number, nondrivers identification card number, last four digits of the social security number, or unique identifying number, municipality, ward and district, registration number and date of registration of each person registered in his county.  This file shall be arranged alphabetically according to names irrespective of municipality, ward, district, registration number, and date of registration. Reasonably sufficient space shall be reserved on each card for the notations to be made thereon as herein provided. The commissioner shall cause to be made notation on these cards as to each registrant respectively whose registration forms have been transferred from one register to another or to the inactive, death or conviction files concurrently with such transfer.  The card with such notations shall show the location of the registration forms of each registrant at all times.  All changes of address of the registrant, including those within the same district, shall be noted on these cards concurrently with changes of address on the registration forms. (cf: P.L.2005, c.145, s.18) 15.  Section 1 of P.L.2005, c.145 (C.19:31-31) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  There shall be established in the Department of State a single Statewide voter registration system, as required pursuant to section 303 of the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002," Pub.L.107-252 (42 U.S.C. s.15483). The principal computer components of the system shall be under the direct control of the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall be responsible for creating the network necessary to maintain the system and providing the computer software, hardware and security necessary to ensure that the system is accessible only to those executive departments and State agencies so designated by the Secretary of State, each county commissioner of registration, each county and municipal clerk, and individuals under certain circumstances, as provided for by this section. The system shall be the official State repository for voter registration information for every legally registered voter in this State, and shall serve as the official voter registration system for the conduct of all elections in the State. b.   The Statewide voter registration system shall include, but not be limited to, the following features: (1)   the name and registration information of every legally registered voter in the State; (2)   the ability to assign a unique identifier to each legally registered voter in the State; (3)   interactivity among appropriate State agencies so designated by the Secretary of State, each county commissioner of registration, each county board of elections, and each county clerk such that these entities shall have immediate electronic access to all or selected records in the system, as determined by the Secretary of State, to receive or transmit all or selected files in the system and to print or review all or selected files in the system; (4)   the ability to permit any county commissioner of registration to enter voter registration information on an expedited basis, and to transfer electronically voter registration information from an online voter registration form completed pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2019, c.382 (C.19:31-6.4c), at the time the information is provided thereto and to permit the Secretary of State to provide technical support to do so whenever needed; (5)   the ability to permit each municipal clerk to view or print information in the system; (6)   the ability to permit an individual, by July 1, 2006, to verify via the Internet whether that individual, and only that individual, is included in the system as a legally registered voter, whether the information pertaining to that individual required by subsection c. of this section is correct, and if not, a means to notify the pertinent county commissioner of registration of the corrections that must be made and to so verify in a way that does not give one individual access to the information required by subsection c. of this section for any other individual; (7)   a Statewide street address index and map in electronic form that can accurately identify the location of every legally registered voter in this State; (8)   the ability to record and monitor all requests for mail-in ballots; to enable the county clerk to verify the identity and signature of each person requesting a mail-in ballot; to record the name and address of each voter determined to be eligible to receive a mail-in ballot for a particular election and to note when a mail-in ballot has been transmitted to that voter by mail or hand delivery; to update the system to allow the postal tracking of mail-in ballots using Intelligent Mail barcodes, or a similar successor tracking system, upon the finding by the Secretary of State that such technology is viable; and to make such information available to the Secretary of State so that a voter can be notified whether the application for such a ballot was accepted or rejected, and the reason for the rejection, using the free-access system established by section 5 of P.L.2004, c.88 (C.19:61-5); and (9)   any other functions required pursuant to Pub.L.107-252 (42 U.S.C. s.15301 et seq.), or Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or that may be deemed necessary by the Secretary of State. c.     The Statewide voter registration system shall include, but not be limited to, the following information for every legally registered voter in this State: (1)   last, first and middle name; (2)   street address at time of registration or rural route, box number or apartment number, if any; (3)   city or municipality, and zip code; (4)   date of birth; (5)   telephone number and e-mail address, if provided on voter registration form; (6)   previous name or address if individual re-registered due to change of name or address; (7)   ward and election district number, if either is available; (8)  (a)  current and valid New Jersey driver's license number; or (b)   if the registrant has not been issued a New Jersey driver's license number, the last four digits of the registrant's social security number; or (c)   unique identifying number for any individual who has not been issued the information sought in subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph; (9)   notation that a copy of one of the following documents has been submitted with the voter registration application, if required: current and valid photo identification card; a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, pay check or any other government document showing the registrant's name and current address; (10)  the method by which the individual registered and; (a) whether that person needs to provide additional identification information to vote using a voting machine instead of a provisional ballot; and (b)   beginning with the first election held after January 1, 2025, and subject to the ten-year voting participation record set forth in paragraph (15) of this subsection, a notation of the document provided as valid proof of identification in accordance with paragraph (2) of subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, or an executed affidavit as to a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from the identification requirement in accordance with paragraph (3) of that subsection, to vote using a voting machine instead of a provisional ballot; (11)  political party affiliation, if designated; (12)  digitized signature; (13)  date of registration or re-registration; (14)  name and street address of the individual assisting in the completion of the form, if the applicant for registration is unable to do so; (15)  voting participation record for ten-year period; and (16)  any other information required pursuant to Pub.L.107-252 (42 U.S.C. s.15301 et seq.), or Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or that the Secretary of State determines is necessary to assess the eligibility of an individual to be registered to vote and to vote in this State. (cf: P.L.2019, c.382, s.4) 16.  Section 2 of P.L.1944, c.230 (C.19:31A-8) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Every person qualified to vote in any election shall at any time after the opening of the polls be at liberty to enter the polling place or room and claim his right to vote at such election in his proper district, and he shall claim such right in person before the district board in the district. The board shall permit no person to vote whose name does not appear in the signature copy register of its election district. Each voter in claiming the right to vote shall first give his full name and address to the member of the district board having charge of the duplicate permanent registration binder and voting record and the signature comparison record, and shall present a document as valid proof of identification or an executed affidavit as to a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from this requirement in accordance with subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17.  Such clerk, if after examining the document presented, is satisfied that it is valid proof of identification or a valid executed affidavit as to a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption to the identification requirement, shall thereupon locate the permanent registration form and voting record and signature comparison record of the voter and shall require the voter to thereupon sign his name in the proper space on his signature comparison record if the voter has previously signed his name on the line marked sample signature.  If the voter has not so signed the member of the district board shall require the voter to sign the line marked sample signature and compare the sample signature with the signature made by such person at the time he registered and if satisfied that they were made by one and the same person he shall then permit the voter to sign his name in the proper space on the signature comparison record.  The voter shall sign his name without assistance using black ink in the proper column on the signature comparison record.  Such signature being completed on the signature comparison record the member of the board having charge of the duplicate permanent registration binder shall audibly and publicly announce the name of the claimant and if the member of the board has ascertained from the duplicate permanent registration binder that the claimant is registered as a qualified voter and upon comparison the member of the board is satisfied that the signature of the claimant and the sample signature on the signature copy register has been made by one and the same person, the member of the board who compared the signature of the voter shall place his initials in the proper column on the signature comparison record signifying that he has made such comparison and is satisfied that the signature of the claimant and sample signature has been made by one and the same person; whereupon the voter shall be eligible to receive a ballot unless it be shown to the satisfaction of a majority of the members of the district board that he is not entitled to vote in the district or has otherwise become disqualified. In addition to signing the signature comparison record and after the comparison of the signature with the signature in the register, a person offering to vote at a primary election for the general election shall announce his name and the party primary in which he wishes to vote. After a person has voted, the member of the district board having charge of the signature copy register shall place the number of the person's ballot in the proper column on the record of voting form of such person, which number shall constitute a record that the person has voted.  In the case of a primary election for the general election such member of the district board shall also place in the proper column on the record of voting form the first three letters of the name of the political party whose primary ballot such person has voted. No person shall be required to sign the signature comparison record as a means of identification if he shall have been unable to write his name when he registered, or if, having been able to write his name when registered, he subsequently shall have lost his sight or lost the hand with which he was accustomed to write or shall by reason of disease or accident be unable to write his name when he applies to vote, but each such person who alleges his inability to sign his name on the signature comparison record shall establish his identity as follows:  one of the members of the district board shall read the same list of questions to the voter as were required upon registration, such questions shall be provided at each election by the commissioner of registration and are to be known as "identification statements for election day."  The member of the board shall write the answers of the voter upon the identification statement. These statements shall be inserted in the front of the duplicate registry binders, at each election, and shall be numbered serially from one to twenty. Each statement shall contain the same questions as the voter was required to answer upon registration.  The questions answered upon registration shall not be turned to or inspected until the answers to the questions shall have been written on election day by the member of the board. At the end of each list of questions shall be printed the following statement:  "I certify that I have read to the above named voter each of the foregoing questions and that I have duly recorded his answers as above to each of said questions"; and the member of the board who has made the above record shall sign his name to such certificate and date the same, and note the time of day of making such record. If the answers to the questions asked of the voter on election day agree with the answers given by him to the same questions at the time he registered, he shall then be eligible to receive a ballot.  Any person who shall permit or attempt to furnish the answers on behalf of the voter shall be guilty of a crime of the fourth degree.  The commissioner of registration shall furnish sufficient identification statements for each election district in each county.  The statements shall be printed on sheets approximately ten by sixteen inches and shall contain a margin of approximately two inches for binding and shall be inserted in the front of the duplicate registry binders each election and shall be in substantially the following form: PLEASE PHOTOCOPY THIS FORM FROM P.L.1996, c.120, s.6. At any election any person who declares under oath and establishes to the satisfaction of a majority of all the members of the district board, that by reason of an inability to read or write, blindness or other physical disability he is unable to mark his ballot without assistance, shall have the assistance of two members of the board who shall not be members of the same political party, to be assigned by the board, in preparing his ballot.  Such members shall retire with such voter to the booth and assist him in the preparation of his ballot and folding the same. The member acting as clerk of the district board shall make an entry on a disability certificate for assistance, which entry shall be in the form of an oath and be inserted in the front of the duplicate registry binders each election. In every instance when such oath was administered to a voter as herein provided, it shall state briefly what facts were sworn to and the names of the members of the board who aided such voter.  Any members of the district board shall be eligible to witness the preparation of the ballot of any such voter, but no other person shall be allowed to assist him in marking his ballot or to witness the marking of the same.  No member of the board shall reveal the name of any person for whom such voter has voted or anything that took place while he was being assisted. Such voter, if blind, disabled, or unable to read or write, may, in lieu of the assistance of the board as above provided, have assistance of some person of his own selection in preparing his ballot.  Such person shall retire with such voter to the booth and assist him in the preparation of his ballot and folding the same.  The name and address of such person shall be recorded as above.  In such case, no other person than the one so selected by the voter shall be allowed to assist such voter in marking his ballot or witness the marking of the same. No person so selected shall reveal the name of any person for whom such voter has voted or anything that took place while he was being assisted. The disability certificates shall be numbered serially one to twenty. The commissioner of registration shall furnish sufficient disability certificates for assistance for each election district in his county.  The disability certificates for assistance shall be printed on sheets approximately ten by sixteen inches and shall contain a margin of approximately two inches for binding and shall be in substantially the following form: PLEASE PHOTOCOPY THIS FORM FROM P.L.1996, c.120, s.6. The commissioner of registration in each county shall furnish sufficient certificates of signature comparison records for each election district in his county to be filled in and signed at the close of the polls by the members of the district board.  A blank space shall also be provided for on the certificate for the signatures of the members of the election board. Under said certificate there shall also be printed the word "Remarks" together with a number of blank lines. The commissioner shall insert one of such certificates in the front of the signature copy register in each election district in the county.  At primary elections the certificate shall be in substantially the following form: PRIMARY ELECTION CERTIFICATION OF SIGNATURE COMPARISON RECORD The undersigned constituting the district board of election in the County of.......................................... in the.............................. (City, Town, Township, Borough or Village) ..................................... Ward................................. District hereby certify that (................................................................) is the correct (Figures) total of the number of names of voters who actually signed the signature comparison records and voted in the DEMOCRATIC PRIMARY ELECTION held on the ...................... day of..................................... 20.... And hereby certify that (.........................) is the correct total of (Figures) the number of names of voters who actually signed the signature comparison records and voted in the REPUBLICAN PRIMARY ELECTION held on the............... day of..............................., 20.... DISTRICT ...................................................Judge................................... Clerk. BOARD OF ELECTION ...................................Inspector........................ Clerk. Remarks:............................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................... At all other elections the certificates shall be in substantially the following form: CERTIFICATION OF SIGNATURE COMPARISON RECORD The undersigned constituting the district board of election in the County of.......................... in the....................................................................... (City, Town, Township, Borough or Village) ........................................ Ward................................ District hereby certify that (................................................................) is the correct (Figures) total of the number of names of voters who actually signed the signature comparison records and voted in the.................................................................................election held       (General, Special or other Election as the case may be) on the .................. day of..............., 20..... . DISTRICT .................... Judge.................................... Clerk. BOARD OF ELECTION ....................Inspector................................ Clerk. Remarks:......................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................... After each election the commissioner of registration shall remove from the binders the identification statements, the disability certificates for assistance, and certifications of signature comparison records and shall preserve them in his office in a suitable place for a period of two years. (cf: P.L.2005, c.154, s.9) 17.  Section 7 of P.L.1999, c.232 (C.19:53C-1) is amended to read as follows: 7.  a.  (1)  The county clerk or the municipal clerk, in the case of a municipal election, shall arrange for the preparation of a provisional ballot packet for each election district.  It shall include the appropriate number of provisional ballots, the appropriate number of envelopes with an affirmation statement, the appropriate number of written notices to be distributed to voters who vote by provisional ballot and one provisional ballot inventory form affixed to the provisional ballot bag. The clerk shall arrange for the preparation of and placement in each provisional ballot bag of a provisional ballot packet and an envelope containing a numbered seal.  The envelope shall contain, on its face, the instructions for the use of the seal, the number and the election district location of the provisional ballot bag, and the identification numbers of the seal placed in the envelope.  Each provisional ballot bag shall be sealed with a numbered security seal before being forwarded to the appropriate election district. (2)   Each provisional ballot bag and the inventory of the contents of each such bag shall be delivered to the designated polling place no later than the opening of the polls on the day of an election. b.    The county clerk or the municipal clerk, in the case of a municipal election, shall arrange for the preparation of the envelope, affirmation statement, and written notice that is to accompany each provisional ballot. The envelope shall be of sufficient size to accommodate the provisional ballot, and the affirmation statement shall be affixed thereto in a manner that enables it to be detached once completed and verified by the county commissioner of registration. The statement shall require the voter to provide the voter's name, and to indicate whether the voter is registered to vote in a county but has moved within that county since registering to vote; or is registered to vote in the election district in which that polling place is located but the voter's registration information is missing or otherwise deficient; or indicate the voter has applied for a mail-in ballot and not received either the ballot or an explanation for not receiving such a ballot pursuant to notification by the county clerk or from the free-access system, or has applied for and received a mail-in ballot and has not transmitted it to the county board of elections or given it to a bearer for delivery to the county board before the time for the opening of the polls on the day of an election but wants, nevertheless, to vote in the election.  The statement shall further require the voter to provide the voter's most recent prior voter registration address and address on the day of the election and date of birth.  The statement shall include the statement: "I swear or affirm, that the foregoing statements made by me are true and correct and that I understand that any fraudulent voting may subject me to a fine of up to $15,000, imprisonment up to five years or both, pursuant to R.S.19:34-11."  It shall be followed immediately by spaces for the voter's signature and printed name, and in the case of a name change, the voter's printed old and new name and a signature for each name, the date the statement was completed, political party affiliation, if used in a primary election, and the name of the person providing assistance to the voter, if applicable.  Each statement shall also provide spaces for the voter's telephone number and email address, including language informing the voter that this contact information will be used to contact the voter concerning the acceptance or rejection of the ballot, and how the voter may cure a defect. A voter's telephone number and email address shall not be subject to public disclosure and shall not be considered a government record. Each statement shall also note the number of the election district, or ward, and name of the municipality at which the statement will be used.  The Secretary of State shall prepare for inclusion in the affirmation statement language for the voter to submit the information required in the registration form described in section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4) in order to enable the county commissioner of registration to process the statement as a voter registration application, which shall be valid for future elections if the individual who submitted the provisional ballot is determined not to be a registered voter.  The Secretary of State shall also prepare and shall provide language for any written instructions necessary to assure proper completion of the statement. The written notice shall contain information to be distributed to each voter who votes by provisional ballot.  The notice shall state that, if the voter is a mail-in registrant voting for the first time in his or her current county of residence following registration or, regardless of the method of registration, voting in any election on or after January 1, 2025, and [was] given a provisional ballot because he or she did not provide required personal identification information or required executed affidavit of a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from the identification requirement in accordance with subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, the voter shall be given until the close of business on the second day after the election to provide identification or an executed affidavit as to a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption to the identification requirement to the applicable county commissioner of registration[,]; and the notice shall contain a telephone number at which the commissioner may be contacted.  The notice shall further state that failure to provide the required personal identification information within that time period shall result in the rejection of the ballot.  The notice shall state that pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2004, c.88 (C.19:61-4), any individual who casts a provisional ballot will be able to ascertain under a system established by the State whether the ballot was accepted for counting, and if the vote was not counted, the reason for the rejection of the ballot.  The notice shall include instructions on how to access such information. c.     For the primary for the general election, the provisional ballots shall be printed in ink on paper of a color that matches the color of the voting authority, which shall indicate the party primary of the voter. The provisional ballots shall be uniform in size, quality and type and of a thickness that the printing thereon cannot be distinguished from the back of the paper, and without any mark, device or figure on the front or back other than as provided in P.L.1999, c.232 (C.19:53C-1 et seq.).  Each such ballot shall include near the top thereof and in large type the designation PROVISIONAL BALLOT.  In all other respects, the provisional ballots shall conform generally to the other ballots to be used in the election district for the primary election. The clerk of the county or municipality shall arrange for the preparation of each provisional ballot package with an appropriate number of provisional ballots for each political party, a corresponding number of envelopes with affirmation statements, and a corresponding number of written notices.  Additional provisional ballots, envelopes, and notices shall be available for delivery to that election district on the day of the election, if necessary. d.    For the general election the provisional ballots shall be printed in ink.  The provisional ballots shall be uniform in size, quality and type and of a thickness that the printing thereon cannot be distinguished from the back of the paper, and without any mark, device or figure on the front or back other than as provided in this act. Each such ballot shall include near the top thereof and in large type the designation PROVISIONAL BALLOT.  In all other respects, the provisional ballots shall conform generally to the other ballots to be used in the election district for the general election. The clerk of the county or municipality shall arrange for the preparation of each provisional ballot package with an appropriate number of provisional ballots, a corresponding number of envelopes with affirmation statements, and a corresponding number of written notices.  Additional provisional ballots, envelopes, and notices shall be available for delivery to that election district on the day of the election, if necessary. e.     For a school election the provisional ballots shall be printed in ink.  The provisional ballots shall be uniform in size, quality and type and of a thickness that the printing thereon cannot be distinguished from the back of the paper, and without any mark, device or figure on the front or back other than as provided in this act.  Each such ballot shall include near the top thereof and in large type the designation PROVISIONAL BALLOT.  In all other respects, the provisional ballots shall conform generally to the other ballots to be used in the election district for the school election. The clerk of the county shall arrange for the preparation of each provisional ballot package with an appropriate number of provisional ballots, a corresponding number of envelopes with affirmation statements, and a corresponding number of written notices. Additional provisional ballots, envelopes, and notices shall be available for delivery to that election district on the day of the election, if necessary. f.     Following the effective date of P.L.2004, c.88 (C.19:61-1 et al.), a provisional ballot that requires the voter to punch out a hole in the ballot as a means of recording the voter's vote shall not be used in any election in this State. g.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2011, c.134). (cf: P.L.2020, c.70, s.7) 18.  Section 3 of P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.  a.  A qualified voter shall be entitled to vote using a mail-in ballot: (1)  in all future elections, including general elections, held in this State, in which the voter is eligible to vote; or (2)  in any single election held in this State. The qualified voter who chooses the option to vote using a mail-in ballot in all future elections shall be furnished with such a ballot by the county clerk without further request on the part of the voter and until the voter requests in writing that the voter no longer be sent a mail-in ballot, or beginning with the 2020 general election cycle, if the voter does not vote by mail in four consecutive years, then the voter shall no longer be furnished with a mail-in ballot for future elections and the voter shall be notified in writing of the change. The mail-in ballot application form prepared by the Secretary of State shall present the two options in the order provided above.  The mail-in ballot application shall also provide spaces for the voter's telephone number and email address, including language informing the voter that this contact information will be used to contact the voter concerning the acceptance or rejection of the ballot, and how the voter may cure a defect.  A voter's telephone number and email address shall not be subject to public disclosure and shall not be considered a government record. The additional direct expenditures required for the implementation of the provisions of this subsection as amended by section 1 of P.L.2018, c.72 shall be offset pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2019, c.459 (C.19:63-29). b.  (1)  Not less than seven days before an election in which a voter wants to vote by mail, the voter may apply to the person designated in section 5 of P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-5), for a mail-in ballot.  The application shall be in writing, shall be signed by the applicant and shall state the applicant's place of voting residence and the address to which the ballot shall be sent.  In the case of a voter choosing to have their mail-in ballot sent to a secondary address, if the ballot is returned or marked undeliverable for two consecutive general elections, then future mail-in ballots shall be mailed to the voter's address where they are registered to vote and the voter shall be notified in writing of the change. The Secretary of State shall prepare a mail-in application form and shall have the authority to promulgate any rules and regulations the secretary deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of this subsection. (2)  Beginning on January 1, 2026 and thereafter, not less than seven days before an election in which a voter wants to vote by mail, instead of submitting an application under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the voter may apply for a mail-in ballot electronically through the voter registration website established by the Secretary of State pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2019, c.382 (C.19:31-6.4c), which application shall be electronically submitted to the person designated by the Secretary of State.  The application shall be in electronic form, shall be signed by the applicant using the applicant's electronic signature in the Statewide Voter Registration System, and shall state the applicant's place of voting residence and the address to which the ballot shall be sent.  The Secretary of State shall prepare a mail-in ballot electronic application form and shall have the authority to promulgate any guidance, guidelines, rules and regulations the secretary deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of this subsection.  The rules and regulations shall ensure the security of the online mail-in ballot application form and the use of verifiable signatures, including a process for the resolution of signature discrepancies and the validation of the information provided by the applicant. c.     Any voter wanting to vote by mail in any election may apply to the person designated in section 5 of P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-5) for a mail-in ballot to be sent to the voter.  A voter who is a member of the armed forces of the United States may use a federal postcard application form to apply for a mail-in ballot. d.    Any voter who fails to apply for a mail-in ballot before the seven-day period prescribed in subsection b. of this section may apply in person to the county clerk for a mail-in ballot up to 3 p.m. of the day before the election. e.     A person voting by mail-in ballot who registered by mail after January 1, 2003, who did not provide personal identification information when registering pursuant to section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4) and is voting for the first time in his or her current county of residence following registration shall include copies of the required identification information with the mail-in ballot.  In addition to providing this personal identification information as may be required, beginning with the first election held after January 1, 2025, a person voting by mail-in ballot, regardless of the method of voter registration, shall include a copy of a document for valid proof of identification as described in paragraph (2) of subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, or an original executed affidavit of a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from this requirement as described in paragraph (3) of that subsection, with the mail-in ballot.  Failure to include such information with the mail-in ballot shall result in its rejection. f.     The county clerk shall not transmit a mail-in ballot for any election to any person who: is deemed by a county commissioner of registration to be an inactive voter; or notifies the clerk in writing that the person no longer wishes to receive such a ballot for any election; or is no longer eligible to vote and whose registration file has been transferred to the deleted file pursuant to R.S.19:31-19. g.    Any mail-in ballot that is sent to a qualified voter and that is returned to the county clerk for any reason shall be forwarded to the commissioner of registration, who shall so note the return in the voter record of that voter. (cf: P.L.2022, c.68, s.1) 19.  Section 6 of P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.  a.  The county clerk, in the case of any Statewide election, countywide election, or school election in a regional or other school district comprising more than one municipality; the municipal clerk, in the case of any municipal election or school election in a school district comprising a single municipality; and the commissioners or other governing or administrative body of the district, in the case of any election to be held in any fire district or other special district, other than a municipality, created for specified public purposes within one or more municipalities, shall publish the following notice in substantially the following form: NOTICE TO PERSONS WANTING MAIL-IN BALLOTS If you are a qualified and registered voter of the State who wants to vote by mail in the......................... (school, municipal, primary, general, or other) election to be held on................. (date of election), the following applies: You must complete the application form below and send it to the county clerk where you reside or write or apply in person to the county clerk where you reside to request a mail-in ballot.  Instead, you may complete the application form electronically on the Secretary of State's website. The name, address, and signature of any person who has assisted you to complete the mail-in ballot application must be provided on the application, and you must sign and date the application. No person may serve as an authorized messenger or bearer for more than three qualified voters in an election, but a person may serve as such for up to five qualified voters in an election if those voters are immediate family members residing in the same household as the messenger or bearer. No person who is a candidate in the election for which the voter requests a mail-in ballot may provide any assistance in the completion of the ballot or serve as an authorized messenger or bearer. A person who applies for a mail-in ballot must submit his or her application at least seven days before the election, but such person may request an application in person from the county clerk up to 3 p.m. of the day before the election. Voters who want to vote by mail in all future elections will, after their initial request and without further action on their part, be provided with a mail-in ballot until the voter requests otherwise in writing, or beginning with the 2020 general election cycle, if the voter does not vote by mail in four consecutive years, then the voter shall no longer be furnished with a mail-in ballot for future elections and the voter shall be notified in writing of the change. Application forms may be obtained by applying to the undersigned either in writing or by telephone, or the application form provided below may be completed and forwarded to the undersigned. Dated..................................................... ........................................................................ (signature and title of county clerk) .................................... (address of county clerk) .................................... (telephone no. of county clerk) b.  (1)  The Secretary of State shall be responsible for providing all information regarding overseas ballots to each overseas voter eligible for such a ballot pursuant to P.L.1976, c.23 (C.19:59-1 et seq.).  The secretary shall also make available valid overseas voter registration and ballot applications to any voter who is a member of the armed forces of the United States and who is a permanent resident of this State, or who is an overseas voter who wishes to register to vote or to vote in any jurisdiction in this State.  The secretary shall provide such public notice as may be deemed necessary to inform members of the armed forces of the United States and overseas voters how to obtain valid overseas voter registration and ballot applications. (2)   The Secretary of State shall undertake a program to inform voters in this State about their eligibility to vote by mail pursuant to this act.  Dissemination of this information shall be included in the standard notices required by this section and other provisions of current law, including but not limited to the notice requirements of R.S.19:12-7, and shall be effectuated by such means as the secretary deems appropriate and to the extent that funds for such dissemination are appropriated including, but not limited to, by means of Statewide or local electronic media, public service announcements broadcast by such media, notices on the Internet site of the Department of State or any other department or agency of the Executive Branch of State government or its political subdivisions deemed appropriate by the secretary, and special mailings or notices in newspapers or other publications circulating in the counties or municipalities of this State. c.     The mail-in ballot materials shall contain a notice that any person voting by mail-in ballot who has registered by mail after January 1, 2003, who did not provide personal identification information when registering and is voting for the first time in his or her current county of residence following registration shall include copies of the required identification information with the mail-in ballot[,]; and [that] addition to providing the personal identification information as may be required by paragraph (1) of this subsection, any person voting by mail-in ballot in any election after January 1, 2025, regardless of the method of registration, shall include a copy of a document for valid proof of identification as described in paragraph (2) of subsection b. of R.S.19:15-17, or an original executed affidavit as to a religious objection to being photographed as an exemption from the identification requirement as described in paragraph (3) of that subsection, with the mail-in ballot.  The notice shall also state that failure to include such information shall result in the rejection of the ballot. d.    The notice provided for in subsection a. of this section shall be published before the 55th day immediately preceding the holding of any election. Notices relating to any Statewide or countywide election shall be published in at least two newspapers published in each county.  All officials charged with the duty of publishing such notices shall publish the same in at least one newspaper published in each municipality or district in which the election is to be held, or if no newspaper is published in the municipality or district, then in a newspaper published in the county and circulating in the municipality or district.  All such notices shall be display advertisements. (cf: P.L.2022, c.68, s.4) 20.  Section 6 of P.L.1980, c.47 (C.39:3-29.7) is amended to read as follows: 6.  a.  The [Division of Motor Vehicles] commission chief administrator shall charge fees as follows: Standard Identification Card, Original         $18 Identification Card, Duplicate                       $5 Identification Card, Renewal                        $18 REAL ID Identification Card                       $29 Digitized photograph             $6, in addition to the fees required above The fees above shall not be charged to any person who, beginning with the first election held after January 1, 2025, requires the identification card as a means of demonstrating valid proof of identification in order to be permitted to vote in accordance with the provisions of Title 19 of the New Jersey Statutes, and the person submits an affidavit of indigence to the chief administrator. b.    The chief administrator may waive the fees established under subsection a. of this section for a person who is homeless who submits proof of temporary residence through a social worker or the coordinator of an emergency shelter for the homeless where the person is temporarily residing.  On or before December 31 of each year, the commission shall report to the Office of Homelessness Prevention in the Department of Community Affairs an accounting of each instance in which the commission provided a fee waiver pursuant to this section.  For the purposes of this section, "person who is homeless" means a person without a domicile who is unable to secure permanent and stable housing as determined by a social worker or the coordinator of an emergency shelter for the homeless established pursuant to P.L.1985, c.48 (C.55:13C-1 et seq.). c.     The chief administrator may waive the fee imposed for a duplicate identification card if the applicant, at the time of application: is applying for a REAL ID identification card, as that term is defined in R.S.39:1-1; currently holds a valid identification card issued by the commission; and is not eligible to renew the applicant's current identification card.  The chief administrator's authority to waive the duplicate identification card fee under this subsection shall expire on October 1, 2020.  In order to receive a REAL ID identification card pursuant to this subsection, the applicant shall first surrender to the commission the applicant's current identification card. (cf: P.L.2019, c.271, s.18) 21.  This act shall take effect immediately but remain inoperative until January 1, 2025; however, the Secretary of State and the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall take any administrative action in advance of the operative date as necessary to implement the provisions of this act.